District of Columbia statutes.
42-2703.03

Financing of homeownership programs.

The Agency may invest in, purchase, make commitments to purchase, take assignments from mortgage lenders, originate, and service mortgage loans either directly or through mortgage lenders pursuant to criteria established by the Agency under a Homeownership program. Such criteria shall comply with the requirements of the Internal Revenue Service, the Department of Housing and Urban Development or other laws, rules and guidelines applicable under the Agency’s plan of financing.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 303, 25 DCR 5008
Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-28, § 2(l)-(n), 28 DCR 2848
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-247, § 2(j), 46 DCR 1100
1981 Ed., § 45-2123.
1973 Ed., § 45-1910.